lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Regbis > Regbio treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės: Regbio vikrumo lazdos; Regbio sukibimo gerinimo priemonės; Regbio kamuolio išmušimo stovai; Regbio iškėlimo blokai linijinei kovai; Regbio atšokimo treniruokliai; Regbio grumtynių mašinos; Regbio užgriebimo treniruočių maišai; Regbio reikmenų skydai; Regbio diržai
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Rúgbi > Equipamentos de treinamento de rúgbi: Bastões de agilidade para rugby; Otimizadores de aderência para rugby; Apoios de chute de rúgbi; Blocos de elevação para lateral de rugby; Redes de rebote de rugby; Máquinas de scrum de rugby; Bolsas para equipamento de rúgbi; Escudos de tackle para rugby; Cintos de tag para rugby
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 英式橄榄球用品 > 英式橄榄球训练辅助用品: 橄榄球敏捷训练标志杆; 橄榄球防滑剂; 英式橄榄球开球座; 橄榄球界外球托举块; 橄榄球反弹网; 橄榄球争球队形训练机; 英式橄榄球装备袋; 橄榄球扑搂防撞垫; 触式橄榄球腰带
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Rugby > Träningsutrustning för rugby: Slalompinnar för rugby; Greppförbättrare för rugby; Kicktees för rugby; Lyftblock för inkast i rugby; Rebounders för rugby; Klungmaskiner för rugby; Rugbytacklingssäckar; Tacklingskuddar för rugby; Tag-bälten för rugby
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Ragbi > Ragbi Eğitim Ekipmanları: Ragbi çeviklik çubukları; Ragbi tutuş artırıcılar; Ragbi Tekme Tişörtleri; Ragbi lineout kaldırma blokları; Ragbi rebounder ağları; Ragbi scrum makineleri; Ragbi Takım Çantaları; Ragbi çarpışma yastıkları; Ragbi tag kemerleri
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Rögbi > Rögbi edzési segédeszközök: Rögbi agility rudak; Rögbi tapadásjavítók; Rögbi-rúgóállványok; Rögbi bedobás-emelő blokkok; Rögbi visszapattanó hálók; Rögbi tolongásgépek; Rögbi-szerelőzsákok; Rögbi ütközőpajzsok; Tag rögbi övek
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Rugby > Sprzęt treningowy do rugby: Tyczki koordynacyjne do rugby; Środki poprawiające chwyt do rugby; Podstawki pod piłkę do rugby; Uchwyty do podnoszenia w autach (rugby); Reboundery do rugby; Maszyny do młyna (rugby); Torby do rugby; Tarcze treningowe do rugby; Pasy do tag rugby
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Rugby > Træningsudstyr til rugby: Agilitystænger til rugby; Grebforbedring til rugby; Rugby-tees til udspark; Løfteblokke til rugby; Reboundere til rugby; Klyngemaskiner til rugby; Rugbypuder til tackling; Tackleskjolde til rugby; Tag-bælter til rugby
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 橄欖球 > 橄欖球訓練輔具: 橄欖球敏捷訓練桿; 橄欖球防滑劑; 橄欖球發球座; 橄欖球界外球舉人輔助塊; 橄欖球反彈網; 橄欖球爭球訓練機; 橄欖球戰術包; 橄欖球衝撞靶; 橄欖球腰旗帶
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Ράγκμπι > Προπονητικά βοηθήματα για ράγκμπι: Πάσσαλοι ευκινησίας ράγκμπι; Ενισχυτικά λαβής ράγκμπι; Βάσεις τοποθέτησης μπάλας στην εκτέλεση κλωτσιάς στο ράγκμπι; Μπλοκ ανύψωσης lineout ράγκμπι; Δίχτυα επαναφοράς ράγκμπι; Μηχανήματα scrum ράγκμπι; Σάκοι ανατροπής ράγκμπι; Ασπίδες τάκλιν ράγκμπι; Ζώνες tag ράγκμπι
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Rugby > Attrezzatura allenamento rugby: Paletti per agilità per rugby; Spray e gel grip per rugby; Magliette per rugby; Supporti per sollevamento in touche per rugby; Reti di rimbalzo per rugby; Macchine per mischia per rugby; Borse per attrezzatura da rugby; Scudi da impatto per rugby; Cinture per tag rugby
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Rugby > Benodigdheden voor rugbytraining: Rugbybehendigheidsstokken; Rugby-gripmiddelen; Kicking tees voor rugby; Rugby line-outblokken; Rugbyrebounders; Rugbyscrummachines; Rugbytackeltassen; Rugbytackleschilden; Rugby-tagriemen
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Ragby > Tréningové pomôcky na rugby: Palice na ragby agility; Pomôcky na zlepšenie úchopu na ragby; Výkopové stojany na rugby; Bloky na zdvíhanie pri autovom vhadzovaní v ragby; Ragbyové odrazovacie steny; Stroje na ragbyové skrumáže; Tašky na rugby; Štíty na ragbyové náčinie; Opasky na ragby
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Rugby > Rugby Training Aids: Rugby Agility Poles; Rugby Grip Enhancers; Rugby Kicking Tees; Rugby Lineout Lifting Blocks; Rugby Rebounders; Rugby Scrum Machines; Rugby Tackle Bags; Rugby Tackle Shields; Rugby Tag Belts
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > รักบี้ > อุปกรณ์ฝึกซ้อมรักบี้: เสาฝึกความคล่องตัวรักบี้; ผลิตภัณฑ์เพิ่มความหนึบมือรักบี้; แท่นตั้งเตะรักบี้; บล็อกซัพพอร์ทยกลายเอาท์รักบี้; อุปกรณ์รีบาวน์เดอร์รักบี้; เครื่องฝึกสครัมรักบี้; กระสอบสำหรับฝึกแท็กเคิลในรักบี้; เบาะฝึกแท็กเกิลรักบี้; เข็มขัดแท็กรักบี้
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Râguebi > Auxiliares de treino para râguebi: Postes de agilidade de râguebi; Intensificadores de aderência de râguebi; Suportes de chuto para râguebi; Blocos de elevação de alinhamento de râguebi; Redes de ressalto de râguebi; Máquinas de formação de râguebi; Sacos de placagem para râguebi; Escudos de placagem de râguebi; Cintos de tag râguebi
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Ragbi > Pripomočki za vadbo ragbija: Palice za agility za ragbi; Ojačevalci oprijema za ragbi; Stojala za udarjanje za ragbi; Dvižni bloki za ragbi linijo; Ragbi odbijalci; Stroji za scrum za ragbi; Torbe z opremo za ragbi; Zaščite za zbijanje za ragbi; Vadbeni pasovi za ragbi
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Rugby > Equipo de entrenamiento de rugby: Postes de agilidad para rugby; Potenciadores de agarre para rugby; Camisetas de rugby; Soportes de elevación para touch de rugby; Rebotadores de rugby; Máquinas de melé para rugby; Bolsas de rugby; Escudos de tackle para rugby; Cinturones de tag rugby
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Bóng bầu dục > Dụng cụ tập luyện bóng bầu dục: Cọc tập độ linh hoạt bóng bầu dục; Phụ kiện tăng độ bám bóng bầu dục; Cột đặt quả bóng bầu dục; Miếng kê nâng người ném biên bóng bầu dục; Lưới dội bóng bầu dục; Máy tập Scrum bóng bầu dục; Túi đựng đồ dùng bóng bầu dục; Tấm chắn tập húc bóng bầu dục; Đai giật cờ bóng bầu dục
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Rugby > Rugby-harjoittelutarvikkeet: Rugbyn ketteryyskepit; Rugbyn pitoaineet; Rugby-potkutiit; Rugbyn sivurajaheiton nostotuet; Rugbyn palautusverkot; Rugbyn scrum-koneet; Rugby-taklaussäkit; Rugbyn taklaustyynyt; Tag rugby -vyöt
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Ragbi > Pomagala za trening ragbija: Štapovi za agilnost za ragbi; Pojačivači hvata za ragbi; Stalak za loptu za ragbi; Blokovi za podizanje za ragbi; Odbijajuće mreže za ragbi; Strojevi za guranje za ragbi; Vreće za rušenje; Štitnici za rušenje za ragbi; Pojasevi s oznakama za ragbi
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Rugby > Articole pentru antrenament rugby: Stâlpi de agilitate pentru rugby; Produse pentru îmbunătățirea aderenței la rugby; Teuri pentru rugby; Blocuri pentru ridicat în touche; Reboundere pentru rugby; Mașini de scrumage pentru rugby; Saci de rugby; Scuturi de placaj pentru rugby; Centuri tag pentru rugby
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Rugby > Matériel d’entraînement de rugby: Jalons d’agilité de rugby; Produits d’adhérence pour le rugby; Tees de coups de pied de rugby; Supports de cuisse pour touche; Rebondeurs de rugby; Jougs de mêlée de rugby; Sacs de plaquage de rugby; Boucliers de percussion de rugby; Ceintures de tag rugby
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 럭비 > 럭비 훈련 장비: 럭비 민첩성 폴; 럭비 그립 강화제; 럭비 킥 티; 럭비 라인아웃 리프팅 블록; 럭비 리바운더; 럭비 스크럼 머신; 럭비 태클 백; 럭비 태클 실드; 럭비 태그 벨트
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Ръгби > Помощни средства за тренировка по ръгби: Колочета за ловкост за ръгби; Средства за по-добър захват за ръгби; Уреди за слагане на топката за ритане за ръгби; Блокчета за повдигане за ръгби; Отскачащи тренировъчни топки за ръгби; Тренировъчни машини за схватка; Чанти за принадлежности за ръгби; Щитове за ръгби; Колани за таг ръгби
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Ragby > Ragbyové tréninkové pomůcky: Slalomové tyče na ragby; Přípravky na zlepšení úchopu pro ragby; Vykopávací podložky (kopátka) na rugby; Zvedací bloky do autu na ragby; Odrazové sítě na ragby; Ragbyové mlýnové trenažéry; Ragbyové narážecí štíty / pytle; Ragbyové narážecí štíty; Pásky na tag ragby
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Rugby > Rugby-Trainingsausrüstung: Rugby-Slalomstangen; Grip-Verstärker für Rugby; Rugby-Kicking-Tees; Rugby-Lineout-Blöcke; Rugby-Rebounder; Gedrängemaschinen; Rugby-Tackle Bags; Rugby-Tackle-Shields; Tag-Rugby-Gürtel
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Регби > Тренировочный инвентарь для регби: Тренировочные стойки для регби; Средства для улучшения хвата для регби; Подставки для мячей для регби; Блоки для поддержки в коридоре для регби; Ребаундеры для регби; Тренажеры для регбийной схватки; Мешки для отработки захватов; Макивары для регби; Пояса для тэг-регби
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > ラグビー > ラグビー練習器具: ラグビー用アジリティポール; ラグビー用グリップエンハンサー; ラグビーキックティー; ラグビー用ラインアウトリフティングブロック; ラグビー用リバウンダー; ラグビースクラムマシン; ラグビータックルバッグ; ラグビー用タックルシールド; ラグビー用タグベルト
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Rugby > Opplæringshjelp for rugby: Slalåmstaver for rugby; Gripeforsterkere for rugby; Sparkestenger for rugby; Løfteblokker for lineout i rugby; Reboundere for rugby; Scrum-maskiner for rugby; Taklingssekker for rugby; Taklingsputer for rugby; Tag-belter for rugby